New Jersey, session 221, A5523.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Where an order to show cause includes an application for the visitation of a family member or other interested party, the court shall set the date on which the order to show cause is heard and for which a temporary order will be issued no more than ten days from the date of the signing of the order.  Upon such application for visitation, there shall be a rebuttable presumption in favor of visitation. Visitation shall only be denied upon clear and convincing evidence that it is not in the best interest of the incapacitated person, such determination shall be on the record, or by written decision.  It shall further be within the courts discretion to provide any limitations deemed appropriate, including but not limited to, supervised visitation. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.